Alabama, session 2026rs, HB291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. For the purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE. Any artificial system or
generative artificial intelligence system that: (i) performs
tasks under varying and unpredictable circumstances without
significant human oversight; or (ii) is able to learn from
experience and improve performance when exposed to data sets.
Page 1

experience and improve performance when exposed to data sets.
HB291 INTRODUCED
(2) CREATOR. Any person who prepares, creates, or
causes the preparation or creation and the dissemination of
any material or media produced by generative artificial
intelligence. The term does not include a broadcaster, cable
provider, digital newspaper, online service, Internet service
provider, streaming platform, provider, or developer of any
technology used in the generation of media by artificial
intelligence, or any employee, representative, or agent
thereof, solely for the distribution of a creator, sponsor, or
purchaser's material or media.
(3) DEPICTED INDIVIDUAL. An individual who is falsely
represented in materially deceptive media.
(4) MATERIALLY DECEPTIVE MEDIA. Any image, audio, or
video that meets all of the following requirements:
a. The media falsely depicts an individual engaging in
speech or conduct in which the depicted individual did not
engage.
b. A reasonable viewer or listener would incorrectly
believe that the depicted individual engaged in the speech or
conduct depicted.
c. The media was produced by artificial intelligence.
(5) SPONSOR. A person at whose request or on whose
behalf any material or media is created, prepared, placed,
published, or disseminated.
Section 2. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a
person shall not distribute, or enter into an agreement with
another person to distribute, materially deceptive media.
(b) The prohibition in subsection (a) does not apply if
Page 2

(b) The prohibition in subsection (a) does not apply if
HB291 INTRODUCED
all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The creator, sponsor, or purchaser includes a
disclaimer in any presentation of the media informing the
viewer both that the media has been manipulated by technical
means and depicts speech or conduct that did not occur. The
following disclaimer is sufficient, but not necessary, to
satisfy the requirements of this subdivision:
"This media has been manipulated by technical means and
depicts speech or conduct that did not occur."
(2) If the media is a video, the disclaimer meets all
of the following requirements:
a. Appears throughout the entirety of the video.
b. Is clearly visible to and readable by the average
viewer.
c. Is in a font and size that is easily readable by the
average viewer.
d. Is in the same language as the language used in the
video media.
(3) If the media consists only of audio and contains no
image or video, the disclaimer is read at the beginning and
end of the media in a clearly spoken manner, in a pitch that
can be easily heard by the average listener, and in the same
language as the audio media.
(4) If the media is an image, the disclaimer meets both
of the following requirements:
a. Is clearly visible to and readable by the average
viewer.
b. Is in the same language as the language used in the
Page 3

b. Is in the same language as the language used in the
HB291 INTRODUCED
image media.
(5) If the media was generated by editing an existing
image, audio, or video, the media includes a citation
directing the viewer or listener to the original source from
which the unedited version of the existing image, audio, or
video was obtained.
(c) A first violation of this section is a Class A
misdemeanor and a second or subsequent conviction within five
years is a Class D felony.
(d)(1) Distribution of material that is prohibited by
this section shall not be a violation of this section if the
distributor does not have actual knowledge that the material
is prohibited, the distributor does not intend to injure or
harm the reputation or prospects of the depicted individual,
and the distributor is: (i) an Internet website, interactive
100 computer service, or radio or television broadcasting station,
101 including, but not limited to, a cable or satellite television
102 operator; (ii) a regularly published newspaper, magazine, or
103 other periodical, including, but not limited to, an Internet
104 or electronic publication, programmer, or producer; or (iii) a
105 website or streaming service, including, but not limited to,
106 an information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153.
107 (2) This act shall not be construed to alter any
108 rights, obligations, or immunities created by 47 U.S.C. § 230.
109 (3) This act shall not apply to any content that
110 constitutes satire or parody and is substantially dependent on
111 the ability of an individual to impersonate a depicted
112 individual physically or verbally and not upon technology or
Page 4

individual physically or verbally and not upon technology or
HB291 INTRODUCED
113 artificial intelligence.
114 (4) This act shall not apply to a radio or television
115 broadcasting station, including a cable or satellite
116 television operator, programmer, producer, streaming provider,
117 Internet website, or a regularly published newspaper,
118 magazine, or other periodical of general circulation,
119 including an Internet or electronic publication, that
120 routinely carries news and commentary of general interest that
121 distributes any materially deceptive media prohibited by this
122 act as part of a bona fide newscast, news interview, news
123 documentary, or on-the-spot coverage or a bona fide news event
124 if the broadcast or publication clearly acknowledges, through
125 content or disclosure, in a manner that can easily be heard
126 and understood by the average listener or viewer, that there
127 are questions about the authenticity of the media.
128 (e) A distributor shall not intentionally remove a
129 disclaimer included with any media by the creator, sponsor, or
130 purchaser of the media.
131 Section 3. (a) Either of the following may seek
132 permanent injunctive relief against a person that violates
133 this act:
134 (1) The Attorney General.
135 (2) A depicted individual.
136 (b)(1) If a court determines that a complaint for
137 permanent injunctive relief filed pursuant to subsection (a)
138 is frivolous, the court shall issue an order suspending the
139 defendant's obligation to respond to the complaint and shall
140 order the plaintiff to show cause why the complaint should not
Page 5

order the plaintiff to show cause why the complaint should not
HB291 INTRODUCED
141 be dismissed. If the plaintiff fails to respond to the court
142 or the plaintiff's response to the court confirms that the
143 complaint is frivolous, the court shall dismiss the complaint
144 and may award costs and attorney fees to the defendant and may
145 issue any appropriate sanctions against the plaintiff and the
146 plaintiff's attorney.
147 (2) If the plaintiff's response to the court assures
148 the court that the complaint is not frivolous, the court shall
149 direct the defendant to answer the complaint.
150 (c) A plaintiff seeking permanent injunctive relief
151 under subsection (a) must prove by clear and convincing
152 evidence that the defendant against whom the injunction is
153 sought knew the media at issue falsely represented the
154 depicted individual.
155 (d) If a plaintiff, other than the Attorney General, is
156 awarded permanent injunctive relief under this section, the
157 court may award costs and attorney fees to the plaintiff.
158 Section 4. This act shall become effective on October
159 1, 2026.
Page 6